Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6953XC (1) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 LEGISLATIVE SALARIES 2 Section 1. Section 2.10, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. Every member of the general assembly except the presiding 5 officer of the senate, the speaker of the house, the majority 6 and minority floor leader of each house, and the president pro 7 tempore of the senate and speaker pro tempore of the house 8 shall receive an annual salary of twenty-five thirty-seven 9 thousand dollars for the year 2007 and subsequent years 2027 10 through 2032 while serving as a member of the general assembly. 11 For the year 2033 and subsequent years, every member of the 12 general assembly except the presiding officer of the senate, 13 the speaker of the house, the majority and minority floor 14 leader of each house, and the president pro tempore of the 15 senate and speaker pro tempore of the house shall receive an 16 annual salary of twenty-five thousand dollars while serving 17 as a member of the general assembly. In addition, each such 18 member shall receive a per diem, as defined in subsection 19 5 , for expenses of office, except travel, for each day the 20 general assembly is in session commencing with the first day 21 of a legislative session and ending with the day of final 22 adjournment of each legislative session as indicated by the 23 journals of the house and senate, except that if the length 24 of the first regular session of the general assembly exceeds 25 one hundred ten calendar days and the second regular session 26 exceeds one hundred calendar days, the payments shall be made 27 only for one hundred ten calendar days for the first session 28 and one hundred calendar days for the second session. Members 29 from Polk county shall receive an amount per day equal to 30 three-fourths of the per diem of the non-Polk county members. 31 Each member shall receive a three hundred dollar per month 32 allowance for legislative district constituency postage, 33 travel, telephone costs, and other expenses. Travel expenses 34 shall be paid at the rate established by section 8A.363 for 35 -1- LSB 6953XC (1) 91 ss/ns 1/ 4 S.F. _____ actual travel in going to and returning from the seat of 1 government by the nearest traveled route for not more than one 2 time per week during a legislative session unless the general 3 assembly otherwise provides. 4 2. a. The speaker of the house, the presiding officer 5 of the senate, and the majority and minority floor leader of 6 each house shall each receive an annual salary of thirty-seven 7 forty-nine thousand five hundred dollars for the year 2007 8 and subsequent years 2027 through 2032 while serving in that 9 capacity. The president pro tempore of the senate and the 10 speaker pro tempore of the house shall receive an annual salary 11 of twenty-seven thirty-nine thousand dollars for the year 2007 12 and subsequent years 2027 through 2032 while serving in that 13 capacity. 14 b. (1) For the year 2033 and subsequent years, the speaker 15 of the house, the presiding officer of the senate, and the 16 majority and minority floor leader of each house shall each 17 receive an annual salary of thirty-seven thousand five hundred 18 dollars while serving in that capacity. 19 (2) For the year 2033 and subsequent years, the president 20 pro tempore of the senate and the speaker pro tempore of the 21 house shall each receive an annual salary of twenty-seven 22 thousand dollars while serving in that capacity. 23 c. Expense and travel allowances shall be the same for the 24 speaker of the house and the presiding officer of the senate, 25 the president pro tempore of the senate and the speaker pro 26 tempore of the house, and the majority and minority leader 27 of each house as provided for other members of the general 28 assembly. 29 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 30 upon the convening of the Ninety-second General Assembly in 31 January 2027. 32 DIVISION II 33 SALARIES OF STATEWIDE ELECTIVE EXECUTIVE OFFICIALS 34 Sec. 3. ELECTIVE EXECUTIVE OFFICIALS ââ SALARIES. 35 -2- LSB 6953XC (1) 91 ss/ns 2/ 4 S.F. _____ 1. The annual salary rates specified in this section are 1 effective for the pay period beginning January 1, 2027, for the 2 remainder of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for 3 subsequent fiscal years until otherwise provided by the general 4 assembly. The salaries provided for in this section shall 5 be paid from moneys appropriated to the department or office 6 specified in this section pursuant to any Act of the general 7 assembly. 8 2. The following annual salary rates shall be paid to the 9 person holding the position indicated: 10 a. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR AND LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR 11 (1) Salary for the governor: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 142,000 13 (2) Salary for the lieutenant governor: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,212 15 b. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 16 Salary for the secretary of agriculture: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,212 18 c. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE 19 Salary for the attorney general: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 135,669 21 d. OFFICE OF THE AUDITOR OF STATE 22 Salary for the auditor of state: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,212 24 e. OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE 25 Salary for the secretary of state: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,212 27 f. OFFICE OF THE TREASURER OF STATE 28 Salary for the treasurer of state: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,212 30 3. This section is repealed December 31, 2032. On that 31 date, the annual salaries for the officials specified in this 32 section shall be as provided in 2005 Iowa Acts, chapter 177, 33 section 2. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -3- LSB 6953XC (1) 91 ss/ns 3/ 4 S.F. _____ The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to salaries of state elected officials. 3 DIVISION I ââ LEGISLATIVE SALARIES. The bill increases 4 the salaries for members of the general assembly, including 5 specified officers, by $12,000 for the years 2027 through 6 2032. For the year 2033 and subsequent years, the bill reverts 7 the salaries for members of the general assembly, including 8 specified officers, to the amounts specified in the 2026 Iowa 9 Code. Pursuant to the Constitution of the State of Iowa, 10 this division applies upon the convening of the 92nd General 11 Assembly in January 2027. 12 DIVISION II ââ SALARIES OF STATEWIDE ELECTIVE EXECUTIVE 13 OFFICIALS. The bill increases the salaries of the governor, 14 lieutenant governor, secretary of agriculture, attorney 15 general, auditor of state, secretary of state, and treasurer of 16 state by $12,000 beginning January 1, 2027, and for subsequent 17 fiscal years. This provision of the bill is repealed December 18 31, 2032. On that date, the annual salaries for such officials 19 shall be as provided in 2005 Iowa Acts, chapter 177, section 2. 20 -4- LSB 6953XC (1) 91 ss/ns 4/ 4